Massachusetts, session 194th, H4548.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 2. Chapter 111 of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the
following section:-
Section 249. There shall be a commission on acupuncture and wellness within the
department. The commission shall consist of: the commissioner of public health or the
commissioner’s designee, who shall chair the commission; the commissioner of insurance or the
commissioner’s designee; the director of MassHealth or the director’s designee; the director of
the board of registration in medicine or the director’s designee; the senate chair of the joint
committee on public health; the house chair of the joint committee on public health; a member
representing a statewide organization of licensed acupuncturists; a member representing a
statewide organization of medical acupuncturists; a member representing the Massachusetts
Public Health Association; and 5 members to be selected by the Governor including: no fewer
than 2 acupuncturists, licensed and practicing in the state of Massachusetts; a member
representing one of the top five health insurance companies in Massachusetts according to
of 5

market share, a member representing a health care consumer organization, and a member
currently practicing as a licensed physician in Massachusetts.
The commission on acupuncture and wellness shall make an investigation and
comprehensive study of the potential for better integrated use of acupuncture services to expand
access, reduce health care costs, and provide improved quality of care to Massachusetts
residents. The commission shall:
(1) Consider strategies to evaluate and implement effective integration of acupuncture
services in health care delivery in Massachusetts with specific focus on interventions in pain
management, substance abuse treatment, and wellness promotion.
(2) Consider strategies to effectively integrate acupuncture treatment modalities into
alternative payment models, including, but not limited to, accountable care organizations,
workplace wellness programs and provider organizations established under chapter 224 of the
acts of 2012.
(3) Consider strategies regarding reimbursement of licensed acupuncturists via third party
payors or otherwise to facilitate a stable and sustainable integration of acupuncture services into
the broader system of health care delivery.
The commission on acupuncture and wellness shall submit to the secretary of health and
human services and the joint committee public health, six months after the effective date of this
act and annually thereafter, a report that includes findings from the commission’s review along
with recommendations and any suggested legislation to implement those recommendations.
of 5

SECTION 3. Said chapter 175 is hereby amended by inserting before section 47CCC the
following section:-
Section 47AAA. (a) Any blanket or general policy of insurance described in subdivision
(A), (C), or (D) of section one hundred and ten which is issued or subsequently renewed by
agreement between the insurer and the policyholder, within or without the commonwealth,
during the period within which this premium is effective, or any policy of accident or sickness
insurance as described in section one hundred and eight which provides hospital expense and
surgical expense insurance and which is delivered or issued for delivery or subsequently renewed
by agreement between the insurer and the policyholder in the commonwealth, during the period
within which this provision is effective, or any employers' health and welfare fund which
provides hospital expense and surgical expense benefits and which is issued or renewed to any
person or group of persons in the commonwealth, during the period within which this provision
is effective, shall provide benefits for acupuncture and oriental medicine based diagnosis and
treatment in the areas of pain management, post-traumatic stress disorder, substance abuse
treatment, and nausea.
SECTION 4. Chapter 175 is hereby further amended by inserting after section 205 the
following section:-
Section 205A. (a) The commissioner shall not approve a policy under section 205 that
does not provide benefits for acupuncture and oriental medicine based diagnosis and treatment in
the areas of pain management, post-traumatic stress disorder, substance abuse treatment, and
nausea.
of 5

SECTION 5. Chapter 176A of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 8DDD the following section:-
Section 8EEE. (a) Any contract between a subscriber and the corporation under an
individual or group hospital service plan delivered, issued or renewed in the commonwealth shall
provide as benefits to all individual subscribers and members within the commonwealth and to
all group members having a principal place of employment within the commonwealth
acupuncture and oriental medicine based diagnosis and treatment in the areas of pain
management, post-traumatic stress disorder, substance abuse treatment, and nausea.
SECTION 6. Chapter 176B of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 4DDD the following section:-
Section 4EEE. (a) Any subscription certificate under an individual or group medical
service agreement delivered, issued or renewed in the commonwealth shall provide benefits to all
individual subscribers and members within the commonwealth and to all group members having
a principal place of employment within the commonwealth for acupuncture and oriental
medicine based diagnosis and treatment in the areas of pain management, post-traumatic stress
disorder, substance abuse treatment, and nausea.
SECTION 7. Chapter 176G of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 4VV the following section:-
Section 4WW. (a) Any group health maintenance contract shall provide coverage for
acupuncture and oriental medicine-based diagnosis and treatment in the areas of pain
management, post-traumatic stress disorder, substance abuse treatment, and nausea.
of 5

SECTION 1. Chapter 32A of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
Section 17Z the following section:-
Section 17AA. The commission shall provide to an active or retired employee of the
commonwealth who is insured under the group insurance commission coverage for acupuncture
and oriental medicine-based diagnosis and treatment in the areas of pain management, post-
traumatic stress disorder, substance abuse treatment, and nausea.
SECTION 8. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, no third-party
payer of health care services shall differentiate reimbursement rates for acupuncture services by
provider type. Only licensed acupuncturists or medical doctors shall be reimbursed for
acupuncture services.
of 5